West Virginia, session 2026, HB4491.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: Article 2. powers and duties of public service commission. §24-2-1s. Certification of advanced small modular nuclear reactors and micronuclear reactors for electric power generation. (a) To the extent not in conflict with federal law, the commission has jurisdiction to issue, refuse to issue, or issue in part and refuse in part, siting certificates, under §24-2-1(d) and §24-2-11c of this code for construction and operation of advanced small modular and micro nuclear reactors for electric power generating facilities, and for the modification of such certificates.(b) To the extent not in conflict with federal law, the commission has jurisdiction to issue, refuse to issue, or issue in part and refuse in part, certificates of convenience and necessity to public utilities under §24-2-11 of this code for construction of advanced small modular and micro nuclear reactors for electric power generating facilities. (c) The commission may promulgate such rules as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this section which are not in conflict with federal law.